Massachusetts, session 194th, H82.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 639 of the Acts of 1950, as amended by Chapter 54 of 
the Acts of 2014, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “causes” the following:-  
“; or by cybersecurity attack or threat thereof that affects the commonwealth’s critical 
infrastructure, information systems owned or operated by the commonwealth, or other 
infrastructure or cyber systems deemed necessary and at risk by the governor.”  
SECTION 2. Section 1 of Chapter 639 of the Acts of 1950, as amended by Chapter 54 of 
the Acts of 2014, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Civil defense” the 
following definitions:-  

of 2 9  “Critical Infrastructure” shall mean the systems and assets within the commonwealth, 
either physical or virtual, so vital to the commonwealth or the United States that the 
incapacitation or destruction of such systems would have a debilitating impact on physical 
security, economic security, public health or safety, or any combination of those matters. This 
can include, but is not limited to: election systems, transportation infrastructure, water, gas, and 
electric utilities.  
“Cybersecurity attack” shall mean an attack, via electronic means, targeting the 
commonwealth’s use of cyberspace for the purpose of disrupting, disabling, destroying, or 
maliciously controlling a computing environment or infrastructure; or destroying the integrity of 
the data or stealing controlled information.  
“Cyber System” shall mean the network of hardware, software, procedures, and people 
put in place by companies, individuals, or governments that can connect to the Internet.